Utah statutes.
61-2-13.   Grounds for revocation of principal broker's license -- Automatic
inactivation of affiliated associate brokers and sales agents licenses.
(1) (a)  An unlawful act or violation of this chapter committed by a person
listed in Subsection (1)(b) is cause for:
(i)  the revocation, suspension, or probation of a principal broker's license;
or
(ii)  the imposition of a fine against the principal broker in an amount not
to exceed $2,500 per violation.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies to an act or violation by any of the following:
(i)  a real estate sales agent or associate broker employed by a licensed
principal broker;
(ii)  a real estate sales agent or associate broker engaged as an independent
contractor by or on behalf of a licensed principal broker; or
(iii)  an employee, officer, or member of a licensed principal broker.
(2) (a)  The revocation or suspension of a principal broker license
automatically inactivates an associate broker or sales agent license granted
to a person by reason of that person's affiliation with the principal broker
whose license is revoked or suspended, pending a change of broker affiliation.
(b)  A principal broker shall, before the effective date of a suspension or
revocation of the principal broker's license, notify in writing every licensee
affiliated with the principal broker of the revocation or suspension of the
principal broker license.
